Wisconsin, session 2025, SB616.
do enact as follows:SB616,11Section 1. 115.28 (67) of the statutes is created to read:SB616,2,92115.28 (67) High-quality tutoring; mathematics. (a) By no later than the 3first day of the 7th month beginning after the effective date of this paragraph .... 4[LRB inserts date], and annually thereafter, compile and post on the department’s 5website a list of entities that provide tutoring that the department considers to be of 6high quality and have the potential to accelerate learning in mathematics. In 7compiling the list under this paragraph, the state superintendent shall designate 8individual tutoring providers as more appropriate for certain grade levels or pupil 9needs.SB616,3,210(b) Solicit qualifications from public and private entities that provide tutoring 11in mathematics to pupils in the elementary grades. The state superintendent may 1establish multiple application periods in any school year for entities to submit their 2qualifications for consideration to be included on the list under par. (a).SB616,3,53(c) Establish a points-based system to evaluate the quality of entities under 4par. (a) and their tutoring programs and determine a minimum score for a tutoring 5program to be included on the list under par. (a).SB616,26Section 2. 118.014 of the statutes is created to read:SB616,3,87118.014 Mathematics; assessments and interventions. (1) 8Definitions. In this section:SB616,3,129(a) “Explicit instruction” means structured and intentional instruction that is 10characterized by clear articulation of learning objectives, explanation of concepts, 11strategic modeling of skills, ongoing checks for understanding, immediate targeted 12feedback, guided questioning, and opportunities for pupils to verbalize reasoning.SB616,3,1313(b) “Independent charter school” has the meaning given in s. 118.016 (1) (h).SB616,3,1714(c) “Numeracy screening assessment” means a diagnostic assessment that is 15valid, reliable, research-based, and predictive of future mathematics achievement 16and is designed to identify pupils who are at-risk of not meeting grade-level 17mathematics standards.SB616,3,2018(d) “Proficient score” means a score that demonstrates a pupil is meeting the 19knowledge and skill expectations described in the state academic standards in 20mathematics for the pupil’s grade level.SB616,3,2421(e) “Qualifying educational entity” means any of the following in which fewer 22than 51 percent of the pupils who took the 4th grade examination under s. 118.30 23(1) in the previous school year attained at least a proficient score on the 24mathematics portion of the examination:SB616,4,111. A school district.SB616,4,222. An independent charter school.SB616,4,53(f) “Qualifying pupil” means a pupil who, in 2 consecutive numeracy screening 4assessments administered under sub. (2) (b), is identified as at-risk of not meeting 5grade-level mathematics standards.SB616,4,76(g) “Quality math tutoring” means tutoring in mathematics that is all of the 7following:SB616,4,881. Aligned with the pupil’s classroom instruction.SB616,4,1092. Includes additional instruction time at least 3 days per week or at least 50 10hours over a 36-week period.SB616,4,13113. Provided by an entity that is included on the list under s. 115.28 (67) or has 12met standards established by a school board or operator of an independent charter 13school for quality mathematics tutoring.SB616,4,1814(2) Numeracy screening plan, assessments, and interventions. (a) 15Each school board and operator of an independent charter school shall develop and 16implement a numeracy screening plan that incorporates the assessments under 17par. (b) for pupils in 5-year-old kindergarten to 8th grade to identify pupils who are 18at-risk of not meeting grade-level mathematics standards.SB616,4,2419(b) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, each school board and operator of an 20independent charter school shall administer a numeracy screening assessment, 21selected by the school board or operator of the independent charter school, to each 22pupil enrolled in 5-year-old kindergarten to 8th grade in the school district or 23independent charter school at least 3 times each school year and shall ensure that 24the numeracy screening assessments are administered as follows:SB616,5,211. The first numeracy screening assessment is administered before the 30th 2day after the first day of the school term.SB616,5,532. The 2nd numeracy screening assessment is administered in the middle of 4the school term, as determined by the school board or operator of the independent 5charter school.SB616,5,763. The 3rd numeracy screening assessment is administered by the date that is 745 days before the last day of the school term.SB616,5,118(c) Each school board and operator of an independent charter school shall 9provide quality math tutoring to pupils who are identified in numeracy screening 10assessments administered under par. (b) as at-risk of not meeting grade-level 11mathematics standards.SB616,5,2012(3) Personal mathematics plans; qualifying pupils. (a) Beginning in the 132026-27 school year, a school board and operator of an independent charter school 14shall develop for each qualifying pupil a personal mathematics plan that includes 15interventions that include explicit instruction. A personal mathematics plan shall 16be developed by no later than 30 days after the pupil is identified as at-risk on the 172nd consecutive numeracy screening assessment required to become a qualifying 18pupil. The personal mathematics plan shall be developed in consultation with the 19qualifying pupil’s parent or guardian and classroom teacher and shall include at 20least all of the following:SB616,5,21211. The pupil’s specific mathematics deficiencies.SB616,5,23222. A description of the interventions and any additional instructional services 23that will be provided to the pupil to address the pupil’s mathematics deficiencies.SB616,6,213. Opportunities for the pupil’s parent or guardian to be involved in the 2interventions described in par. (b).SB616,6,334. How the pupil’s progress will be monitored.SB616,6,445. Quality math tutoring.SB616,6,95(b) Each school board and operator of an independent charter school shall 6provide the interventions described in a qualifying pupil’s personal mathematics 7plan to the qualifying pupil, as soon as practicable, and shall continue to implement 8the personal mathematics plan until the qualifying pupil is meeting grade-level 9mathematics standards.SB616,6,1210(4) Mathematics achievement plans; qualifying educational entities. 11(a) By July 1, 2026, the department shall establish a model mathematics 12achievement plan that includes at least all of the following:SB616,6,14131. An analysis of pupil performance data, including results from numeracy 14screening assessments administered under sub. (2) (b).SB616,6,16152. Measurable pupil performance goals for improving mathematical 16proficiency.SB616,6,20173. Evidence-based strategies to meet the needs of pupils who are identified as 18at-risk of not meeting grade-level mathematics standards, including the use of 19explicit instruction in interventions and alignment to high-quality instructional 20materials.SB616,6,23214. A professional development plan that includes training in evidence-based 22practices aligned to the 2008 final report of the national mathematics advisory 23panel.SB616,7,2245. Instructional strategies to improve pupil performance in mathematics, 1including the use of explicit instruction and practices that support the development 2of mathematical proficiency.SB616,7,53(b) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, each qualifying educational entity 4shall establish and submit to the department a mathematics achievement plan that 5includes the elements under par. (a) 1. to 5.SB616,7,76(c) The department shall post each mathematics achievement plan submitted 7under par. (b) on the department’s website.SB616,7,88